South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3189.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 1, Title 6 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 6-1-165. A member of a school district board, municipal council, or county council is authorized to place one or more items for consideration and discussion on the agenda of any public meeting of the board or council on which he serves. This request may not be subject to the approval of another member of the governing body. Upon making the request, the items must be placed on the agenda of the meeting, subject to the notice requirements of the Freedom of Information Act. If such a properly requested item is not placed on the agenda, the member is entitled to a three minute period of personal privilege during the meeting to publicly address the item and note its improper failure to be placed on the agenda, with additional such three minute periods for each additional requested item that was not placed on the agenda, if any. All such periods of personal privilege must occur before the meeting may lawfully be adjourned, and any motion to adjourn made before these periods occur is invalid. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----